Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Chapter 111. Foreign-Trade Zones

§ 4121.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Public corporation” means this State, a political subdivision of this State, a corporate instrumentality of this State and one or more states, or a bi-state compact.

“Private corporation” means a general and business or a general nonprofit corporation organized under the laws of this State.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 3, 1976.

§ 4122.
Authority to establish foreign-trade zones.

All public and private corporations shall have the power to apply to the proper authorities of the U.S. government for a grant, and when such a grant is issued, to establish and operate foreign-trade zones under the provisions of the Foreign-Trade Zone Act of 1934 as amended on March 3, 1976.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 3, 1976.